test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-78vwima_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `võima: # Verb (72+73) `võima 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     võima+V+Inf/mA: võima
     võima+V+Inf: võidaq
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: või
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: võit
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: või
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: võimiq
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: võitiq
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: võivaq
     võima+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: võiq
     võima+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: või

     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: võisõ
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: võisõt
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: võisõ
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: võisõmiq
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: võisõtiq
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: võisõq
     võima+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: või-is

     võima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: võiva
     võima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: võiva
     võima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: võivat
     võima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: võivahe
     võima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: võivaq
     võima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: võividõ
     võima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: võivit
     võima+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: võivihe

     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: võinuq
     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: võinu
     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: võinut
     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: võinuhe
     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: võinuq
     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: võinuidõ
     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: võinuid
     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: võinuihe


     võima+V+Act+PrfPrc: võinuq
     võima+V+Pss+PrfPrc: võit
